Tennessee, session 114, SB1218.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. This act is known and may be cited as the "Parole Relief and Opportunity
Act."
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-28-202(a), is amended by adding
the following new subdivision:
(8) A parolee whose income level does not meet the requirements of basic
necessities of the parolee's household when considering the parolee's family
responsibilities or who has not obtained gainful employment that would allow the person
to meet basic necessities of the parolee's household despite reasonable efforts to do so.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-28-202(b), is amended by
deleting the language "subdivisions (a)(1), (3) and (4)" and substituting "subdivisions (a)(1), (3),
(4), and (8)".
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-28-201(a)(2), is amended by
deleting the language "In addition" and substituting "Except in those cases waived by the
director as hardship cases, in addition".
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-28-201(a)(3)(B), is amended by
deleting the last sentence and substituting:
In cases of hardship as set forth in § 40-28-202, the department must waive the payment
required by this subdivision (a)(3)(B).
SB1218
002586
- 1 -

SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-28-201(a)(5), is amended by
adding the following language to the end of the subdivision:
In cases of hardship as set forth in § 40-28-202, the department must waive the fee
required by this subdivision (a)(5).
SECTION 7. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-28-201(c), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(1) Except as provided in subdivision (c)(2), in the event of more than two (2)
months' arrearage or delinquency in making either or both of the contributions, the
arrearage or delinquency constitutes sufficient ground for revocation of the parole,
probation, or other release program of the person in arrears.
(2) A person who has not made the contributions required by this section for a
period of two (2) months may notify the department that the person is experiencing a
hardship, pursuant to § 40-28-202, and request the department to reevaluate the
person's financial ability to comply with this section. If the department determines that
the person is experiencing a hardship, the contributions that the person has not made
must be waived and the person must not be required to make future contributions until
such time that the person is no longer experiencing a hardship.
SECTION 8. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 002586